Hawaii statutes.
§273-13 Bylaws, regulations. The
corporation may from time to time make bylaws and regulations for the
management and control of the railway, and for regulating the traffic thereon;
and the bylaws and regulations on being approved by the governor, shall have
the force of law. The corporation shall, at all times, cause a copy of the
bylaws and regulations to be posted and exhibited at the principal stations on
the line of railway. [L 1878, c 29, §24; RL 1925, §900; RL 1935, §1806; RL
1945, §5064; RL 1955, §106-13; HRS §273-13]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next